Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 101 Academic Credit for Military Service

16-101-1.
Academic credit for military service.

State public higher education institutions in the state shall honor the military training, experience, correspondence courses, and occupations of an individual who has served in the military or armed forces of the United States by allowing academic credits that meet the standards of the American Council on Education or equivalent standards for awarding academic credit, if the award of the educational credit is based upon the institution’s admission standards and its role, scope, and mission. The board of education shall adopt policies or regulations requiring each institution to award educational credits to a student enrolled in the institution, based upon the student’s military training or service when academically appropriate.

The board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island, in consultation with the president and the faculty senate, shall adopt policies or regulations requiring the award of educational credits to a student enrolled at the university, based upon the student’s military training or service when academically appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 9.